test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-oojka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - о̄йка: # Noun 122 'eng old man/est kahju/fin' - full paradigm
     о̄йка+N+Sg+Nom: о̄йка
     о̄йка+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: о̄йкам
     о̄йка+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: о̄йкан
     о̄йка+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: о̄йкатэ
     о̄йка+N+Du+Nom: о̄йкаг
     о̄йка+N+Pl+Nom: о̄йкат
#
     рума+N+Sg+Nom: рума
     рума+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: румам
     рума+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: руман
     рума+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: руматэ
     рума+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: [румаме̄н, румамен]
     рума+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: руман
     рума+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: руматэ̄н
     рума+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: румав
     рума+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: рума̄н
     рума+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: руманыл

     рума+N+Sg+Loc: румат
     рума+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: румамт
     рума+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: румант
     рума+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: руматэт
     рума+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: румаме̄нт
     рума+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: румант
     рума+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: руматэ̄нт
     рума+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: румавт
     рума+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: рума̄нт
     рума+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: руманылт
     рума+N+Du+Loc: румаг
     рума+N+Du+Loc: румагт
     рума+N+Pl+Nom: румат
     рума+N+Pl+Loc: руматт
